Washington statutes.
RCW 5.44.070

Certified copies of instruments, or transcripts of county commissioners' proceedings.

Copies of all deeds or other instruments of writing, maps, documents and papers which by law are to be filed or recorded in the office of said county auditor, and all transcripts or exemplifications of the records of the proceedings of the board of county commissioners certified by said auditor under official seal, shall be admitted as prima facie evidence in all the courts of this state.

[Code 1881 s 2737; 1869 p 315 s 27; RRS s 10612.]

NOTES:

Certified copy of plat as evidence: RCW 58.10.020.

Legislative authority proceedings to be published: RCW 36.22.020.